District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

15-710

Fees and costs in Domestic Relations Branch of Court of General Sessions.

Repealed.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 554, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(13)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-710.